District of Columbia statutes.
42-3531.04

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Chief” means Chief Tenant Advocate established by § 42-3531.06.

(2)

“Office” means the Office of the Tenant Advocate established by § 42-3531.05.

(3)

Repealed.

(4)

“Tenant” and “tenant organization” shall have the same meaning as in § 42-3401.03(17) and (18), and shall include any other tenant organization.

History

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2064, 52 DCR 7503
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 266(a), 62 DCR 1884

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-271 repealed (3).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2064 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 266(a) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 266(a) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).